dictionaries/da_DK/da_DK-2.5.024.dic
etableret/12,42
etmål/45,12
fabriksny/49,12,39
fabuleren/44
famøs/49,12,39
fartgal/49,12,39
farvet/12,42
fastboende/44,44,8,8
fastkurssamarbejde/45,12
feberfri/49,12,39
fedtlever/44
fejlfuld/49,12,39
ferskrøget/12,42
fidel/49,12,39
filisteri/45,12
fin-fin/49,12,39
firkantet/12,42
fjas/45,12
fjendsk/49,12,39
fjernereliggende/44,44,8,8
fladpandet/12,42
flatterende/44,44,8,8
flerguderi/45,12
flor/45,12
flortynd/49,12,39
flosset/12,42
flæskekød/45,12
fløjtende/44,44,8,8
foder/45,12,32
fodkold/49,12,39
foranliggende/44,44,8,8
forbandt/45,12
forbipasserende/44,44,8,8
forbitret/12,42
fordomsfri/49,12,39
forenende/44,44,8,8
forfald/45,12
forhastet/12,42
forklarende/44,44,8,8
forkølet/12,42
formal/49,12,39
formler/45,12
forpjusket/12,42
forskende/44,44,8,8
forskudsvis/49,12,39
forstørret/12,42
forsvarsberedskab/45,12
fortræd/44
foruroliget/12,42
forventningsfuld/49,12,39
fradragsberettiget/12,42
fransk/44,32
fredløs/49,12,39
fremadskridende/44,44,8,8
fremme/44
fremsyn/45,12
fremtrædende/44,44,8,8
frimureri/45,12
friskbrygget/12,42
fritflydende/44,44,8,8
frivol/49,12,39
frydefuld/49,12,39
frygtindgydende/44,44,8,8
fugtplettet/12,42
fuldblod/45,12
fuldgod/49,12,39
fællig/44
fængbar/49,12,39
færdigpakket/12,42
førstehåndskendskab/45,12
førstkommende/44,44,8,8
galdesyg/49,12,39
gåpåmod/45,12
går/44
gejl/45,12
generalpræventiv/49,12,39
gennemfarvet/12,42
gennemvåd/49,12,39
genopbyggende/44,44,8,8
giftiggul/49,12,39
glatføre/45,12,32
glip/44
glohed/49,12,39
godartet/12,42
godlidende/44,44,8,8
gods/45,12,32
gold/49,12,39
gramnegativ/49,12,39
grovfoder/45,12
grovkornet/12,42
grundlæggende/44,44,8,8
grus/45,12,32
gudsrige/45,12
gulbrun/49,12,39
guldindfattet/12,42
gumlen/44
gøgl/45,12
habil/49,12,39
halvellevetiden/44
halvklar/49,12,39
halvmåneformet/12,42
halvmørke/45,12
håndstrikket/12,42
hankeløs/49,12,39
"happy end"/44
hartkorn/45,12
havgående/44,44,8,8
havskum/45,12
held/45,12
helgarderet/12,42
hellang/49,12,39
helsebringende/44,44,8,8
hensyntagende/44,44,8,8
himmelspræt/44
histamin/45,12,32
hjemgående/44,44,8,8
hjemmestyret/12,42
hjemmeværende/44,44,8,8
hjertesyg/49,12,39
hokuspokus/44
hove/44
hovedkulds/49,12,39
hoveri/45,12,32
hullet/12,42
hurtigtvoksende/44,44,8,8
husly/45,12
hvid/49,12,39
hvidstribet/12,42
hydrogen/45,12
hæfte/44
hø/45,12
højeksplosiv/49,12,39
højloftet/12,42
højre/44,32
højtgearet/12,42
højtsiddende/44,44,8,8
ikke-eksisterende/44,44,8,8
ikkehvid/49,12,39
ildebefindende/45,12
ildspyende/44,44,8,8
imperial/49,12,39
indbefattet/12,42
indeholdende/44,44,8,8
indleven/44
indskrænket/12,42
indtægtsgivende/44,44,8,8
industriaffald/45,12
infantil/49,12,39
instruktiv/49,12,39
interface/45,12
intet/44,32
intrauterin/49,12,39
ituslået/12,42
iværksætterfremme/44
jask/45,12
jorderig/45,12
jordløs/49,12,39
jordstrygende/44,44,8,8
jævnaldrende/44,44,8,8
kalkstøv/45,12
kanel/45,12,32
kanonfuld/49,12,39
karikeret/12,42
kasten/44
kattegrus/45,12
kausal/49,12,39
keyboard/45,12,32
klamydia/44,32
klattet/12,42
klerikal/49,12,39
kludder/45,12
klynken/44
knas/45,12
knoklet/12,42
knurren/44
knæhøj/49,12,39
kodein/45,12
kommunitet/45,12
komparativ/49,12,39
kompetencegivende/44,44,8,8
koncentreret/12,42
kontaktsøgende/44,44,8,8
kontinental/49,12,39
korte/49,12,39
kortbølget/12,42
kortsyn/45,12
kortærmet/12,42
krigsberedskab/45,12
krigsførende/44,44,8,8
kriminalpoliti/45,12
kromatin/45,12,32
kromosomal/49,12,39
kruset/12,42
krybskytteri/45,12
kulturbærende/44,44,8,8
kunstnerblod/45,12
kuperet/12,42
kuriøs/49,12,39
kvælende/44,44,8,8
kær/49,12,39
kævl/45,12
kødkvæg/45,12
kødædende/44,44,8,8
kølnervand/45,12
laget/12,42
landsdækkende/44,44,8,8
landsplan/45,12,32
langluvet/12,42
langtidsarbejdsløs/49,12,39
lavbenet/12,42
lavmål/45,12
lavtsiddende/44,44,8,8
leptosom/49,12,39
letrøget/12,42
leucin/45,12,32
leve/44,32
ligtøj/45,12
livsblod/45,12
livsfornægtende/44,44,8,8
livsled/49,12,39
lokalsprog/45,12
lokket/12,42
lungesyg/49,12,39
lynne/45,12
lysbrydende/44,44,8,8
læ/45,12
læbeblomstret/12,42
længselsfuld/49,12,39
løv/45,12,32
løvfældende/44,44,8,8
mådehold/45,12
magtgal/49,12,39
månedslønnet/12,42
mangan/45,12
mangelfuld/49,12,39
masende/44,44,8,8
maskinsnedkeri/45,12
medanklaget/12,42
medeje/45,12,32
medløberi/45,12
medtiltalte/44
mellemblond/49,12,39
mellemkød/45,12
merforbrug/45,12
metalskinnende/44,44,8,8
meterlang/49,12,39
metionin/45,12
miljøsvineri/45,12
mirakuløs/49,12,39
modstridende/44,44,8,8
moler/45,12
mongol/49,12,39
morgengry/45,12
mosgroet/12,42
multinational/49,12,39
mundlæder/45,12
myosin/45,12
mønsterdannende/44,44,8,8
mørke/45,12
mørkegul/49,12,39
mørklødet/12,42
nattely/45,12
nedskåret/12,42
negativ/49,12,39
nemesis/44
nuancerig/49,12,39
nugældende/44,44,8,8
nybrygget/12,42
nykværnet/12,42
nyrestaureret/12,42
nysprog/45,12
nødlidende/44,44,8,8
nøgenfrøet/12,42
observerbar/49,12,39
omkringboende/44,44,8,8
ondartet/12,42
ondskabsfuld/49,12,39
opblussen/44
opfej/45,12
oppegående/44,44,8,8
opplantet/12,42
Stærk/12,42
organisationsansvar/45,12
otteårig/49,12,39
overbærende/44,44,8,8
overgroet/12,42
overlæ/45,12
oversukret/12,42
påfølgende/44,44,8,8
papiraffald/45,12
parvis/49,12,39
pejsebrænde/45,12
pelsforet/12,42
perm/44
perpleks/49,12,39
pjaltet/12,42
pjankeri/45,12
planterig/49,12,39
plejekrævende/44,44,8,8
plyshår/45,12
polykrom/45,12,32
polær/49,12,39
poppet/12,42
principal/49,12,39
proportional/49,12,39
prostaglandin/45,12
provencalsk/44
psykogen/49,12,39
pukkelrygget/12,42
radiær/49,12,39
ragelse/45,12
ranglet/12,42
realiserbar/49,12,39
rede/44
regnvand/45,12
rekreativ/49,12,39
respektløs/49,12,39
resultatorienteret/12,42
rigspoliti/45,12,32
rigtblomstrende/44,44,8,8
risikofri/49,12,39
rodfæstet/12,42
rustfarvet/12,42
ry/45,12
rykfri/49,12,39
rystende/44,44,8,8
rødrandet/12,42
saftevand/45,12
sakramental/49,12,39
samfundsrettet/12,42
samhørende/44,44,8,8
sammenrod/45,12
sammenvokset/12,42
schweizertysk/44,32
sejlbar/49,12,39
selvcentreret/12,42
selveje/45,12
selvejende/44,44,8,8
selvlysende/44,44,8,8
selvtænkende/44,44,8,8
sennepsgul/49,12,39
sexet/12,42
sinde/44
situativ/49,12,39
sjusket/12,42
skemafri/49,12,39
skidt/45,12
skimlet/12,42
skolesøgende/44,44,8,8
skriftklog/49,12,39
skruptosset/12,42
skudhold/45,12
skægløs/49,12,39
skævøjet/12,42
slags/44
slaveri/45,12
slugvorn/49,12,39
småkød/45,12
smalbladet/12,42
småsyg/49,12,39
smertestillende/44,44,8,8
smuldret/12,42
snetung/49,12,39
snyd/45,12
snæversynet/12,42
solglitrende/44,44,8,8
sommerbrun/49,12,39
sorbitol/45,12
sorthåret/12,42
specialfremstillet/12,42
spindelvævstynd/49,12,39
splittet/12,42
spøgefuld/49,12,39
spørgen/44
statsstyret/12,42
stedbarn/45,12
stendød/49,12,39
stillesiddende/44,44,8,8
stivsindet/12,42
stofrig/49,12,39
storstilet/12,42
storvildt/45,12,32
stramtsiddende/44,44,8,8
strygefri/49,12,39
stumpnæset/12,42
støv/45,12,32
støvfri/49,12,39
sugende/44,44,8,8
sukkerfri/49,12,39
svar/49,12,39
svingen/44
svækket/12,42
synsk/49,12,39
syttentiden/44
sæsonpræget/12,42
sømandskab/45,12
søvnløs/49,12,39
tål/44,32
tavs/49,12,39
teaterinteresseret/12,42
testosteron/45,12,32
tidkort/44
tilbagebøjet/12,42
tilgodehavende/44,44,8,8
tilsynsførende/44,44,8,8
titulær/49,12,39
tobenet/12,42
toptrænet/12,42
totalitær/49,12,39
trådformet/12,42
trelænget/12,42
trinløs/49,12,39
trivselsfremmende/44,44,8,8
tryptofan/45,12,32
tuberkuløs/49,12,39
tueformet/12,42
tvesind/45,12
tværstribet/12,42
tyndtflydende/44,44,8,8
tætbebygget/12,42
tørfoder/45,12
uafsluttet/12,42
ubefæstet/12,42
uberygtet/12,42
ublandet/12,42
udadgående/44,44,8,8
udefinerbar/49,12,39
udhængende/44,44,8,8
udkokset/12,42
udvisningstruet/12,42
uforklaret/12,42
uformåen/44
ufrankeret/12,42
ugæstmild/49,12,39
uindfattet/12,42
ukendskab/45,12
ukrydret/12,42
umiddelbar/49,12,39
umøbleret/12,42
underliggende/44,44,8,8
unuanceret/12,42
upoleret/12,42
uproduktiv/49,12,39
usprøjtet/12,42
ustabil/49,12,39
utiltalende/44,44,8,8
V-formet/12,42
vandladningsbesvær/45,12
varmeisolerende/44,44,8,8
vaskbar/49,12,39
velbygget/12,42
velgørende/44,44,8,8
velskrevet/12,42
verdensherredømme/45,12,32
verdensomspændende/44,44,8,8
verificerbar/49,12,39
